Mississippi, session 2026, HB532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 97-35-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-35-47.  (1)  It shall be unlawful for any person to report a crime or any element of a crime, including an allegation of child abuse or neglect, to any law enforcement agency or officer, the Department of Child Protection Services, or any officer of any court, by any means, knowing that the report is false.  A violation of this section shall be punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one (1) year or by fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both.  In addition to any fine and imprisonment, and upon proper showing made to the court, the defendant shall be ordered to pay as restitution to the law enforcement agency reimbursement for any reasonable costs directly related to the investigation of the falsely reported crime and the prosecution of any person convicted under this section. (2)  It shall be unlawful for any person to make a false report of a crime, any element of a crime or of an emergency involving a public or private elementary or secondary school or public or private postsecondary educational institution, which intentionally, knowingly or recklessly interferes with or disrupts the normal operations of any such school or educational institution.  A violation of this section shall be punishable as follows: (a)  If the alleged defendant is of the age of majority, by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed five (5) years or by fine not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or both; or (b)  (i)  If the alleged defendant is a minor, not having yet attained the age of majority, the youth court shall impose: 1.  A minimum of one hundred twenty (120) hours of community service; 2.  A fine not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00); or 3.  Both community service and fine as prescribed within the limits of items 1 and 2 of this subparagraph (i); and (ii)  If the adjudicated minor defendant violates the terms of the sentence imposed by the youth court under subparagraph (i), the court shall order the minor in contempt, and shall reprimand the minor to a juvenile detention facility for a minimum of ten (10) days, but not to exceed fifteen (15) days. (c)  In addition to any community service, fine and subsequent juvenile detention, and upon proper showing made to the court, the minor defendant may be ordered to pay as restitution to the law enforcement agency reimbursement for any reasonable costs directly related to the investigation of the falsely reported crime and the prosecution of any person convicted under this section. (3)  A report is false under this section when it is unsupported by any credible evidence and the person intentionally submitted the report knowing it was false. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.